Utah statutes.
63A-3-104.   Appropriation for contingency purposes -- Procedure for
allotment -- Legislative intent.
(1) (a)  The Legislature shall determine the amount to be appropriated for
contingency purposes, as well as the limits on the amount of any one allotment
or total allotments to any one department or agency.
(b)  In advance of making any such allotment, the governor shall notify the
Legislature through the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, of his or
her intent to do so, of the amount to be allotted, and the justification for
the allotment.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that such transfers be made only for
unforeseeable emergencies, and allotments shall not be made to correct poor
budgetary practices or for purposes having no existing appropriation or
authorization.
